Florida, session 2026, HB1495.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 112.044, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
112.044 Public employers, employment agencies, labor
organizations; discrimination based on age prohibited;
exceptions; remedy.—
(5) NOTICE TO BE POSTED.—Each employer, employment agency,
and labor organization shall post and keep posted in conspicuous
places upon its premises, or on the Internet in a manner that is
accessible to the employer's employees if permitted under
federal law, notices required by the United States Department of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1495 2026
Labor and the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission.
Section 2. Section 440.055, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
440.055 Notice requirements.—An employer who employs fewer
than four employees, who is permitted by law to elect not to
secure payment of compensation under this chapter, and who
elects not to do so shall post clear written notice in a
conspicuous location at each worksite, or on the Internet in a
manner that is accessible to the employer's employees and the
general public, directed to all employees and other persons
performing services at the worksite of their lack of entitlement
to benefits under this chapter.
Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
443.151, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
443.151 Procedure concerning claims.—
(1) POSTING OF INFORMATION.—
(a) Each employer must post and maintain in places readily
accessible to his or her employees, or on the Internet in a
manner that is accessible to his or her employees, individuals
in her or his employ printed statements concerning benefit
rights, claims for benefits, and other matters relating to the
administration of this chapter as the Department of Commerce may
by rule prescribe. Each employer must supply to individuals
copies of printed statements or other materials relating to
claims for benefits as directed by the rules of the department.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1495 2026
The department shall supply these printed statements and other
materials to each employer without cost to the employer.
Section 4. Subsection (2) of section 448.109, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
448.109 Notification of the state minimum wage.—
(2) Each employer who must pay an employee the Florida
minimum wage shall prominently display a poster substantially
similar to the one made available pursuant to subsection (3) on
the Internet in a manner that is accessible to the employer's
employees or in a conspicuous and accessible place in each
establishment where such employees are employed.
Section 5. Subsection (2) of section 450.045, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
450.045 Proof of identity and age; posting of notices.—
(2) Any person who hires, employs, or suffers to work any
minor shall post on the Internet in a manner that is accessible
to his or her employees, or at a conspicuous place on the
property or place of employment, where it may be easily read, a
poster notifying minors of the Child Labor Law, to be provided
by the division upon request.
Section 6. Subsection (11) of section 760.10, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
760.10 Unlawful employment practices.—
(11) Each employer, employment agency, and labor
organization shall post and keep posted in conspicuous places
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1495 2026
upon its premises, or on the Internet in a manner that is
accessible to the employer's employees, a notice provided by the
commission setting forth such information as the commission
deems appropriate to effectuate the purposes of ss. 760.01-
760.10.
Section 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1495-00